test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kyeli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - kyeli: # i-e-á-stems
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom: kyeli
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen: kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Acc: kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Ill: kuálán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc: kyeleest
    kyeli+N+Sg+Com: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Sg+Abe: kyelettáá
    kyeli+N+Ess: kyellin
    kyeli+N+Par: kyellid
    kyeli+N+Pl+Nom: kyeleh
    kyeli+N+Pl+Gen: kuolij
    kyeli+N+Pl+Acc: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Ill: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Loc: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Pl+Com: kuolijguin
    kyeli+N+Pl+Abe: kuolijttáá
